District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.46

Incorporators.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 198, ch. 269, § 46
Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-61, § 2, 24 DCR 6011
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(o), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.46.
1981 Ed., § 29-346.
1973 Ed., § 29-921.